Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 61.530 is amended to read as follows:
Any person who is an employee on the date his or her department first participates in the
system, either in service or on leave from service, who does not elect within the time set
forth in KRS 61.525 to become a member and thereby make contributions required of
him or her by KRS 61.510 to 61.705, shall forfeit all right for credit for service with any
department prior to the date he or she might subsequently elect to become a member,
except as provided in KRS 61.552.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:52 PM Jacketed